Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. Public Works and Contracts
§ 16-6-112.
Contractor's performance and payment bond or other guarantee; when required; conditions; amount; approval; filing; enforcement upon default.

Any contract entered into with a public entity for a public work where the contract price exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00), shall require any contractor before beginning work under the contract to furnish the public entity a bond. If the contract price is one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) or less, the public entity may require the contractor to furnish any other form of guarantee approved by the public entity. The bond or other form of guarantee shall be:

Available and with such conditions that allow for the payment of all taxes, excises, licenses, assessments, contributions, penalties and interest lawfully due the state or any political subdivision;

For the use and benefit of any person performing any work or labor or furnishing any material or goods of any kind which were used in the execution of the contract, conditioned for the performance and completion of the contract according to its terms, compliance with all the requirements of law and payment as due of all just claims for work or labor performed and materials furnished in the execution of the contract;

In an amount not less than one hundred percent (100%) of the contract price unless the price is one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) or less, in which case the public entity may fix a sufficient amount;

Approved by and filed with the appropriate officer, agent, governing body or other designee of the public entity.

A bond or other guarantee satisfactory to the public entity shall include the obligations specified under subsection (a) of this section even though not expressly written into the guarantee.

In default of the prompt payment of all obligations under the guarantee, a direct proceeding may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction by the authorized officer or agency to enforce payment. The right to proceed in this matter is cumulative and in addition to other remedies provided by law.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 137, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 329; R.S. 1931, § 95-201; C.S. 1945, § 22-501; Laws 1957, ch. 190, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-674; Laws 1963, ch. 173, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-312; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 206, § 1; 1994, ch. 57, § 1; 2012, ch. 106, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 134, § 1, effective February 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00)” for “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)” in the introductory language of (a) and in (a)(iii).

Laws 2012, ch. 106, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “the construction, major maintenance or renovation of” for the erection, construction, alteration, repair or addition to” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “W.S. 9-2-3004(c)(iv)” for “W. S. 9-2-1016(b)(xviii).”

The 2019 amendment,

in (a), substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500.00).”

Laws 2019, ch. 134, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote the introductory language of (a), which read “Except as provided under W.S. 9-2-3004(c)(iv), any contract entered into with the state, any county, city, town, school district or other political subdivision of the state for the construction, major maintenance or renovation of any public building or other public structure or for any public work or improvement and the contract price exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), shall require any contractor before beginning work under the contract to furnish the state or any political subdivision, as appropriate, a bond or if the contract price is one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) or less, any other form of guarantee approved by the state or the political subdivision. The bond or other form of guarantee shall be”; in (a)(i) substituted “Available and with such conditions that allow for the payment” for “Conditioned for the payment”; in (a)(ii) substituted “labor performed and materials furnished” for “labor performed, material furnished and taxes, excises, licenses, assessments, contributions, penalties and interest accrued”; in (a)(iii) substituted “not less than one hundred percent (100%)” for “not less than fifty percent (50%),” “price is” for “price exceeds,” and “or less, in which case the public entity may fix” for “in which case the appropriate officer, agent or the governing body may fix”; in (a)(iv), substituted “agent, governing body or other designee of the public entity” for “agent or other designee of the state or governing body of the political subdivision”; and in (b), substituted “satisfactory to the public entity” for “satisfactory to the state or political subdivision, as the case may be.”

Contractual penalties. —

This section did not impose liability on prime contractor and its surety for contractual penalties imbedded in agreement between subcontractor and its supplier. Vaughn Excavating & Constr., Inc. v. P.S. Cook Co., 981 P.2d 485,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1999).

Second-tier materialman to subcontractor is within coverage of section. —

The benefit of a contractor's bond on a public works project is not limited to those in privity of contract with a subcontractor or the general contractor. D & L Bldg. v. State, 747 P.2d 517,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1987).

A supplier to a materialman to a subcontractor to a contractor has a claimable interest pursuant to this section, although he is not in privity of contract with the subcontractor or general contractor. DeLozier Bros. v. Fremont County School Dist., 747 P.2d 515,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 567

(Wyo. 1987).

Section is not unconstitutional

because the surety is made liable for materials furnished but not bodily entered into the permanent structure. Franzen v. Southern Sur. Co., 35 Wyo. 15, 246 P. 30,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1926).

Fact question whether materials “used” in contract's execution. —

The question of whether materials are “partially used or expended” in the execution of contract, within the intent of this section, is deemed one for the trier of fact. Colorado Builders' Supply Co. v. National Fire Ins. Co., 423 P.2d 79,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1967).

Labor and material contributing to work completion furnished “in execution of contract.” —

Labor and material contributing directly or indirectly to the completion of work and within the contemplation of the parties constitute labor and material furnished “in the execution of the contract,” within the meaning of this section. Franzen v. Southern Sur. Co., 35 Wyo. 15, 246 P. 30,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1926).

Section not limited by mechanic's lien provisions. —

The requirement that a contractor engaged in public work must execute a bond for the benefit of those furnishing labor and material does not limit labor and material furnished to such as would be lienable under the mechanic's lien provisions. Franzen v. Southern Sur. Co., 35 Wyo. 15, 246 P. 30,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1926).

Claims hereunder may be assigned and notice and action maintained by an assignee.

Shoshoni Lumber Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 46 Wyo. 241, 24 P.2d 690,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1933).

A bank taking an assignment of a materialman's claims against a contractor constructing a bridge for the state does not thereby make loans to the contractor nor pay the materialman's claims, but has a prima facie legal right to sue the contractor's surety. State Bank v. Turpen, 47 Wyo. 284, 34 P.2d 1,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 47 Wyo. 328, 37 P.2d 679,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1934).

Service of notice of claim before notice of contract's completion not premature. —

Service of a materialman's notice of claim after the completion of a highway, but before the highway commission has published notice of completion, is not premature. National Sur. Co. v. W. H. Holliday Co., 42 Wyo. 407, 295 P. 913,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1931).

Cost of coal and coal oil recoverable. —

The cost of coal used for the generation of power of a machine used by highway contractors in the construction of a road, coal oil used in the lighting camp and the haulage of such items is recoverable under a highway contractor's bond. Franzen v. Southern Sur. Co., 35 Wyo. 15, 246 P. 30,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1926).

As is horse feed. —

Feed furnished to horses, used by a highway contractor in the performance of a contract, is material furnished in the execution of the contract, for which the surety under the highway contractor's bond is liable. Franzen v. Southern Sur. Co., 35 Wyo. 15, 246 P. 30,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1926).

But cost of overshoes furnished highway contractors and their men is not recoverable

under the contractor's bond. Franzen v. Southern Sur. Co., 35 Wyo. 15, 246 P. 30,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1926).

Nor price of material constituting part of contractor's plant. —

A bonding company is not to be liable for the purchase price of machinery or other material which constitutes part of the plant or outfit of a contractor. Colorado Builders' Supply Co. v. National Fire Ins. Co., 423 P.2d 79,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1967).

Although repairs of machinery actually used on job covered. —

When machinery is actually on a job and repairs become necessary to keep it in operating condition, to the end that the job may be completed, the bond in such a case ought to cover the repairs. Colorado Builders' Supply Co. v. National Fire Ins. Co., 423 P.2d 79,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1967).

Cited

in

George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1940).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

False receipts or the like as estopping materialmen or laborers from recovering on public work bond, 39 ALR2d 1104.

Relative rights as between surety on public work contractor's bond and unpaid laborers or materialmen in percentage retained by obligee, 61 ALR2d 899.

Liability on bid bonds for public works, 70 ALR2d 1370.

Labor or material furnished subcontractor for public work or improvement as within coverage of bond of principal contractor, 92 ALR2d 1250.

What constitutes “public work” within statute relating to contractor's bond, 48 ALR4th 1170.

State or local government's liability to subcontractors, laborers, or materialmen for failure to require general contractor to post bond, 54 ALR5th 649.

§ 16-6-113.
Contractor’s performance and payment bond or other guarantee; right of action; notice to obligee; intervention by interested parties; pro rata distribution.

Any person entitled to the protection of a bond or other form of guarantee approved by a public entity under W.S.

16-6-112

may maintain an action for the amount due him. He shall notify the obligee named in the bond or other guarantee of the beginning of the action, giving the names of the parties, describing the guarantee and stating the amount and nature of his claim. No judgment shall be entered in the action within thirty (30) days after the giving of the notice. The obligee or any person having a cause of action may on his motion, be admitted as a party to the action. The court shall determine the rights of all parties to the action. If the amount realized on the bond or other guarantee is insufficient to discharge all claims in full, the amount shall be distributed among the parties pro rata.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 137, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 330; R.S. 1931, § 95-202; C.S. 1945, § 22-502; W.S. 1957, § 9-675; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-313; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 206, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “approved by a public entity under” for “approved by the state or any political subdivision under” and made stylistic changes.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of surety on private bond for punitive damages, 2 ALR4th 1254.

State or local government's liability to subcontractors, laborers, or materialmen for failure to require general contractor to post bond, 54 ALR5th 649.

§ 16-6-114.
Contractor’s performance and payment bond or other guarantee; requiring new or additional bond or other guarantee; failure to furnish.

If in its judgment any of the sureties on a bond or other form of guarantee approved by the public entity under W.S.

16-6-112

are insolvent or for any cause are no longer proper or sufficient sureties, the obligee may within ten (10) days require the contractor to furnish a new or additional bond or other approved guarantee. If ordered by the obligee, all work on the contract shall cease until a new or additional bond or other guarantee is furnished. If the guarantee is not furnished within ten (10) days, the obligee may at its option terminate the contract and complete the contract as the agent and at the expense of the contractor and his sureties.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 137, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 331; R.S. 1931, § 95-203; C.S. 1945, § 22-503; W.S. 1957, § 9-676; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-314; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 206, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “approved by the public entity” for “approved by the state or any political subdivision” and “terminate the contract” for “determine the contract.”

§ 16-6-115.
Contractor’s performance and payment bond or other guarantee; limitation of actions.

No action shall be maintained on any bond or other form of guarantee satisfactory to the public entity under W.S.

16-6-112

unless commenced within one (1) year after the date of final completion of the public work as provided in W.S. 16-6-116(a)(iv).

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 137, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 332; Laws 1925, ch. 132, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 95-204; Laws 1935, ch. 67, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 22-504; W.S. 1957, § 9-677; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-315; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 206, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Applied

in

Shoshoni Lumber Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 46 Wyo. 241, 24 P.2d 690,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(1933); Colorado Bldrs. Supply Co. v. National Fire Ins. Co., 423 P.2d 79,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1967).

Cited

in

National Sur. Co. v. W.H. Holliday Co., 42 Wyo. 407, 295 P. 913,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1931).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “public entity” for “state or any political subdivision” and “final completion of the public work as provided in W.S. 16-6-116(a)(iv)” for “first publication of notice of final payment of the contract.”

§ 16-6-116.
Payment to contractor; substantial completion; final completion; required notices.

When any public work is let by contract, the public entity under whose direction or supervision the work is being carried on and conducted shall:

Issue a certificate of substantial completion after determination that the public work, or designated portion thereof the public entity agrees to accept separately, is substantially complete;

Upon issuance of a certificate of substantial completion, cause notice to be published in a newspaper of general circulation, published nearest the point at which the work is being carried on, once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, and posted on the state procurement website or the public entity’s official website. The notice shall set forth in substance that the public entity has accepted the work, or designated portion thereof, as substantially complete according to the contract and associated documents and that the general contractor is entitled to payment as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection upon the forty-first day (and the notice shall specify the exact date) after the notice was first published and posted. If the contract provides for multiple substantial completions, this paragraph shall apply to each substantial completion designated in the contract;

Upon the forty-first day after the notice required under paragraph (ii) of this subsection was first published and posted, the public entity under whose direction or supervision the work has been carried on shall pay to the general contractor any payment retained by the public entity under W.S. 16-6-702(b) together with any other amount due under the contract, less any amount withheld for the portion of the public work that is incomplete or not completed in accordance with the contract and associated documents;

Issue a certificate of final completion after determination that the contract is fully performed and all portions of the public work are acceptable under the contract and associated documents. Any amounts withheld under paragraph (iii) of this subsection for the portion of the public work that was determined incomplete or not in accordance with the contract and associated documents and due under the contract shall be paid to the general contractor. The public entity shall post the date of final completion for the public work on the state procurement website or the public entity’s official website.

This section does not relieve the general contractor and the sureties on his bond from any claims for work or labor done or materials or supplies furnished in the execution of the contract.

The public entity shall provide written notice of the requirements of this section in the project specifications.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 151, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 95-301; Laws 1935, ch. 78, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 22-505; W.S. 1957, § 9-678; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-316; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Payment deferred until expiration of statutory period. —

A contractor has no right to receive the balance due upon his contract and the highway department does not have the right to pay the balance until the expiration of the 40-day period of advertising and notice. Woodward Const. Co. v. Clark, 82 F. Supp. 700, 1948 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3156 (D. Wyo. 1948), aff'd in part and rev'd in part, 179 F.2d 176, 1950 U.S. App. LEXIS 4090 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1950).

Claim commenced before last publication of notice of completion sufficient to support judgment. —

A petition showing the service of a notice of claim on the defendants before the last publication by the highway commission of the notice of completion of work on a highway contract, but failing to show the posting of the notice of completion, is still sufficient to support a judgment against the defendant. National Sur. Co. v. W. H. Holliday Co., 42 Wyo. 407, 295 P. 913,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1931).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, rewrote and designated former undesignated paragraph as introductory language of (a), (a)(ii), (a)(iii) and (b), which read, “When any public work is let by contract the commission, board or person under whose direction or supervision the work is being carried on and conducted and upon whose approval intermediate and final estimates are paid for the construction of the work, forty (40) days before the final estimate is paid, shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation, published nearest the point at which the work is being carried on, once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks, and also to post in three (3) conspicuous places on the work, a notice setting forth in substance, that the commission, board or person has accepted the work as completed according to the plans and specifications and rules set forth in the contract between the commission, board or person and the contractor, and that the contractor is entitled to final settlement therefor. The notice shall also set forth that upon the 41st day (and the notice shall specify the exact date) after the first publication of the notice the commission, board or person under whose direction or supervision the work has been carried on will pay to the contractor the full amount due under the contract. This section does not relieve the contractor and the sureties on his bond from any claims for work or labor done or materials or supplies furnished in the execution of the contract”; added (a)(i) and (a)(iv); and added (c).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(ii) substituted “forty-first” for “41st.”

The section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

§ 16-6-117.
Payment to contractor; prerequisite filing of contractor’s statement of payment; disputed claims.

In all contracts entered into by any person with a public entity for a public work, no payments under W.S. 16-6-116(a) shall be made until the person files with the public entity with which the contract has been made, a sworn statement setting forth that all claims for material, supplies and labor performed under the contract have been and are paid for the entire period of time for which the payment is to be made. If any claim for material, supplies or labor is disputed the sworn statement shall so state, and the amount claimed to be due the subcontractor or materialmen may be filed by the claimant as a claim against the general contractor’s surety bond. Payment to the general contractor under W.S. 16-6-116(a) shall be paid without regard to any pending claims against the general contractor’s surety bond unless the public entity has actual knowledge that the surety bond is deficient to settle known present claims, in which case an amount equal to the disputed claims may be withheld.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 94, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 22-506; Laws 1953, ch. 148, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-679; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-317; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Applied

in

D & L Bldg., Inc. v. State ex rel. Maltby Tank & Barge, Inc., 747 P.2d 517,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1987).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote the former section, which read “In all formal contracts entered into by any person with the state, or any department or commission thereof, or with any county, city, town, school district, high school district, or other public corporation of this state, for the construction of any public building, or the prosecution and completion of any public work, or for repairs upon any public building or public work, no final payment shall be made until the person files with the officer, department or commission of the state, or with the clerk of the county, city, town or school district, or with a similar officer of any other public corporation by which the contract has been made, a sworn statement setting forth that all claims for material and labor performed under the contract have been and are paid for the entire period of time for which the final payment is to be made. If any claim for material and labor is disputed the sworn statement shall so state, and the amount claimed to be due the laborer shall be deducted from the final payment and retained by the state, county, city, town or school district authority or public corporation until the determination of the dispute, either by judicial action or consent of the parties, and then paid by the agent or agency to the persons found entitled thereto.”

§ 16-6-118.
Unlawful interest of officeholders in public contracts or works; exception.

It is unlawful for any person, now or hereafter holding any office, either by election or appointment, under the constitution or laws of this state, to become in any manner interested, either directly or indirectly, in his own name or in the name of any other person or corporation, in any contract, or the performance of any work in the making or letting of which the officer may be called upon to act or vote. It is unlawful for any officer to represent, either as agent or otherwise, any person, company or corporation, in respect of any application or bid for any contract or work in regard to which the officer may be called upon to vote or to take or receive, or offer to take or receive, either directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of value, as a gift or bribe, or means of influencing his vote or action in his official character. Any contracts made and procured in violation of this subsection are null and void and the person violating this subsection may be removed from office.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an act shall not be unlawful under this section if any person who is interested in any public contract or who represents any person, company or corporation interested in any public contract discloses the nature and extent thereof to all the contracting parties concerned therewith, absents himself during the considerations and vote thereon, does not attempt to influence any of the contracting parties and does not act directly or indirectly for the public entity in the inspection, operation, administration or performance of any contract. This section does not apply to the operation, administration, inspection or performance of banking and deposit contracts and relationships after the selection of a depository.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 25, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2624; C.S. 1910, § 280; C.S. 1920, § 319; R.S. 1931, § 95-101; C.S. 1945, § 22-513; W.S. 1957, § 9-680; Laws 1969, ch. 158, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-8-318; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “an act shall not be unlawful under this section if any person who is” for “if any person is,” “who represents” for “shall represent,” “or corporation interested in any public contract discloses the nature” for “or corporation, but shall disclose the nature,” “absents himself” for “and shall absent himself,” “does not attempt” for “and not attempt,” “does not act” for “not act,” “the public entity in the inspection” for “the governing body in inspection,” “contract” for “contract, then the acts are not unlawful under this section,” and “apply to” for “apply as to.”

Conflict of interest rule founded on public policy. —

The rule that no public official should be interested in a contract entered into by him is founded on public policy forbidding persons of fiduciary character from acting for themselves in a business in which their character binds them to act for others. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Incompatibility of office sufficient for vacation of office. —

An incompatibility of office or position involves a conflict of duties between two offices or positions and may be sufficient for the vacation of an office when a conflict of interest is not. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

And question of any incompatibility not eliminated by 1969 amendment. —

An analysis of the principles pertaining to conflict of interest and its relation to the rule against incompatibility will show that while the legislature intended to permit a qualified exception to conflict of interest prohibitions by amending former § 6-8-508 (see now §

6-5-106

) and this section, it would be an unwarranted construction of the 1969 amendatory legislation to hold that it eliminated any question of incompatibility. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

Incompatibility between a member of the board of trustees of a school district and his employment as teacher in that district was not eliminated by the 1969 amendment of former § 6-8-508 (see now §

6-5-106

) and this section. Haskins v. State, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1973).

Spouse as school trustee compatible with other spouse as school employee. —

A husband and wife do not constitute a single entity for the purpose of incompatibility of office and position which will prevent one of them, as a trustee of a school district, from exercising impartial and independent judgment in the public interest on a matter in which the other is involved as an employee of the district. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Private attorneys defending officials charged with misconduct cannot be paid with county funds. —

County commissioners may not employ and pay, with county funds, private attorneys to defend them in an action charging them with misconduct in fraudulently conspiring to extort money from the treasury of the county for their individual benefit and to which they were not legally entitled, the county attorney having refused to defend them. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Contract in which officer has personal interest void or voidable. —

Municipal contracts in which officers of the city have a personal pecuniary interest are, ordinarily at least, void or voidable. Quackenbush v. Cheyenne, 52 Wyo. 146, 70 P.2d 577,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1937).

Contract deemed nullity unless subsection (b) complied with. —

A person is not disqualified from holding an office or position that conflicts with other interest of that person if he complies with the requirements of the provisos of subsection (b); otherwise, the contract or other action is a nullity and the person is subject to criminal prosecution. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Quo warranto remedy inapplicable. —

Where the legislature has recognized the existence of conflicts of interest and has directed the procedure and remedies applicable thereto, the remedy of quo warranto is inapplicable. Coyne v. State, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Common-Law Rule Against Holding Incompatible Offices — Abolishing the ‘Office’ Haskins v. State ex rel. Harrington, 516 P.2d 1171,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 192

, 70 A.L.R.3d 1171 (Wyo. 1973),” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 667 (1974).

For case note, “Conflict of Interest — Legal Interests vs. Relational Interests. Coyne v. State ex rel. Thomas, 595 P.2d 970,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 424

(Wyo. 1979),” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 349 (1980).

§ 16-6-119.
Contracts for public works; right to reject bids or responses; qualifications of bidders and respondents.

Every public entity shall be authorized to determine the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders or respondents on contracts for public works and may reject any or all bids or responses for which it solicits based on the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders and respondents and readvertise for bids or responses.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 88, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 2006, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “or respondents,” and “or responses” and made a similar change.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “major maintenance or renovation” and made a stylistic change.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 29, § 1, effective October 1, 2020, substituted “all bids or responses for which it solicits” for “all bids or responses.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, substituted “Every public entity shall” for “Every state agency, board, commission, department, or institution shall” and “contracts for public works and may reject” for “contracts for the construction, major maintenance or renovation of a public project, facility or structure using standard forms and procedures adopted by the department of administration and information, and may recommend that the department of administration and information reject.”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Cross references. —

As to purchasing and property control division accepting recommendations of agencies on award of bids, see § 9-2-1016(b)(xvii).

Legislative intent. —

It was clearly the legislature's intent under the provisions of this section that the Wyoming Water Development Commission was to be actively and directly involved in reviewing bids, determining responsible bidders, and withholding funds when necessary in order to ensure that projects involving the public water supply served the best interests of the public and the State of Wyoming. Whitlock Constr., Inc. v. S. Big Horn County Water Supply Joint Powers Bd., 2002 WY 36, 41 P.3d 1261,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2002).

Right to reject bids. —

This section provides that every state board, commission or agency, including the Wyoming water development commission, is authorized to determine qualifications and responsibilities for bidders on contracts for public projects. Whitlock Constr., Inc. v. S. Big Horn County Water Supply Joint Powers Bd., 2002 WY 36, 41 P.3d 1261,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of state, municipality, or other governmental entity to accept late bids for public works contracts, 49 ALR5th 747.

§ 16-6-120.
Rulemaking; penalties; enforcement.

The department of workforce services shall promulgate rules and regulations as the department determines necessary or convenient to enforce this act.

Unless punishable under subsection (c) of this section, an individual or a business entity and any officer or member thereof that intentionally falsifies information under this act shall be:

Fined seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for each violation for each day during which the violation continues;

Barred from bidding on any contract subject to the provisions of this act or submitting any request for proposal on any project subject to the provisions of this act for one (1) year from the date the violation is corrected.

Any person who signs an affidavit submitted to the department pursuant to W.S. 16-1-101(a), knowing any information contained therein is false, shall be guilty of false swearing punishable as a felony in accordance with W.S. 6-5-303(a).

The department of workforce services is authorized and directed to enforce W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-206

.

In the event a contractor fails to comply with an order from the department, the director shall refer the matter to the appropriate district or county attorney for enforcement of the department’s order.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 223, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

16-6-119

; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2011, ch. 82, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 80, § 1; 2013 ch. 134, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a) and (b); added designation (c); and added (d).

The 2012 amendments. —

The first 2012 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a) and (c).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 80, § 1, in (a), deleted “of employment” following “department” near the beginning, and substituted “as the department determines necessary or convenient” for “required”; in introductory language of (b), substituted “Unless punishable under subsection (c) of this section, an individual” for “A person”; in (b)(ii), deleted “state” preceding “contract” and “project” and inserted “subject to the provisions of this act” twice; added (c) and redesignated former (c) and (d) as (d) and (e); and deleted “of employment” for “The department” in (d).

Laws 2012, ch. 80 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the introductory language of (b), which read: “Unless punishable under subsection (c) of this section, an individual, partnership, association, limited partnership, registered limited partnership, registered limited liability company or corporation and any officer or member thereof that intentionally falsifies information under this act shall be.”

Editor's notes. —

This section, as enacted, was designated as
Â§b16-6-119. Since Laws 1987, ch. 88, Â§b1, had already enacted a
Â§b16-6-119, this section has been redesignated as
Â§b16-6-120.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 16-6-101(a)(vi).

§ 16-6-121.
Notice required to receive protection under a bond or guarantee; limitation; notice required by owner in project specifications.

Any subcontractor or materialman entitled to the protection of a bond or other form of guarantee approved by a public entity under W.S.

16-6-112

shall give notice of his right to that protection to the general contractor. Failure to give notice to a general contractor who has complied with subsections (f) and (g) of this section waives the subcontractor or materialman’s protection under the bond or guarantee.

The notice shall be given no later than sixty (60) days after the date on which services or materials are first furnished.

The notice shall be sent to the general contractor by certified mail, electronic means or delivered to and receipted by the general contractor or his agent. Notice by certified mail or electronic means is effective on the date the notice is mailed or sent electronically.

The notice shall be in writing and shall state that it is a notice of a right to protection under the bond or guarantee. The notice shall be signed by the subcontractor or materialman and shall include the following information:

The subcontractor or materialman’s name, address and phone number and the name of a contact person;

The name and address of the subcontractor’s or materialman’s vendor; and

The type or description of the materials or services provided.

This section shall only apply where the general contractor’s contract is for an amount exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00).

The general contractor shall post on the construction site a prominent sign citing this section and stating that any subcontractor or materialman shall give notice to the general contractor of a right to protection under the bond or guarantee and that failure to provide the notice shall waive the subcontractor or materialman’s protection under the bond or guarantee.

The owner or his agent shall provide written notice of the information required by this section in the project specifications.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 82, § 1; 2020 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “general contractor” for “prime contractor” throughout the section; in (a) substituted “a public entity” for “the state or any political subdivision” and deleted “and waives any right to a lien for materials or services provided” at the end; in (c) added “electronic means” after “certified mail” throughout, and “or sent electronically” after “is mailed”; in (e) substituted “an amount exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) or more”; and in (f) deleted “and shall waive any right to a lien for materials or services provided” at the end.

Cross references. —

As to required notice of right to claim a lien, see § 29-2-111.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of notice to public works contractor on United States project under Miller Act (40 U.S.C. § 270b(a)), 98 ALR Fed 778.